Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Chapter 12

Costs

20-12-101. Recovery by successful party.

The successful party in all civil actions is entitled to full costs, unless otherwise directed by law or by a court of record, for which judgment shall be rendered.

Code 1858, § 3197 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 74); Shan., § 4938; mod. Code 1932, § 9091; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1601.

Cross-References. Change of venue, costs, §§20-4-210,20-4-211.

Clerk's fees, §8-21-401.

Compensation of court reporter, §20-9-103.

Continuance, costs, §§20-7-103,20-7-104.

Costs, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 54; T.R.A.P. 6, 18, 40; Tenn. R. Sup. Ct. 7.

Divorce cases, costs, §36-4-122.

Duties of sheriff, §8-8-201.

Fees due public officers, §8-21-104.

Hearings in tobacco tax matters, costs, §67-4-1018.

Reciprocal enforcement of support, §36-5-214.

Setoff, costs, §20-6-402.

Sheriff's fees for collection of costs, §8-21-902.

Surveyor's fees, §8-12-109.

Testimony taken by deposition, §24-9-101.

Witness fees paid by successful party, §24-4-107.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 242, 244.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-54.04-1.

Law Reviews.

Constitutionality of the Fee System of Justices of the Peace (Hugh C. Simpson), 14 Tenn. L. Rev. 565.

Judgments and Appeal, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 373.

Comparative Legislation. Costs:

Ala. Code §12-19-20 et seq.

Ark. Code §16-68-301 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §15-10-80 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 453.010 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § R.C.P. 54.

Mo. R.C.P. R. 77.01.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 6-1 et seq.

Va. Code § 14.1-177 et seq.

Cited: Bridges v. Agee, 167 Tenn. 324, 69 S.W.2d 891, 1933 Tenn. LEXIS 43 (1934); Marshall v. Sevier County, 639 S.W.2d 440, 1982 Tenn. App. LEXIS 396 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1982); Barrett v. Town of Nolensville, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. App. LEXIS 119 (Tenn. Ct. App. Mar. 10, 2011); Bernatsky v. Designer Baths & Kitchens, LLC, — S.W.3d —, 2013 Tenn. App. LEXIS 106 (Tenn. Ct. App. Feb. 15, 2013).

20-12-102. Litigation tax.

Litigation taxes shall be payable as required by §§67-4-602 —67-4-606. A successful plaintiff in any civil action shall be reimbursed by the defendant for any litigation tax incurred, in the same manner as are costs.

Code 1958, § 551; Shan., § 706; Code 1932, § 1257; Acts 1961, ch. 310, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1602; Acts 1982, ch. 925, § 1.

Cross-References. Attorney generals' retirement tax, § 8-622 (Vol. 3 Appendix).

Tax not imposed on actions to enforce tax liens, §67-5-2410.

20-12-103. Copies of records.

The necessary fees paid by the successful party in procuring copies of deeds, bonds, wills or other records filed as part of the testimony shall be taxed in the bill of costs.

Code 1858, § 3206 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 116, § 2); Shan., § 4948; Code 1932, § 9101; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1603.

Collateral References. 20 Am. Jur. 2d Costs §§ 60-66.

20 C.J.S. Costs §§ 1, 185, 249, 255.

Costs
182.

20-12-104. Postage.

Postage or expressage paid by the officers of the court, or by the parties in sending process, depositions and other papers, being part of the record, by mail or express, shall be taxed in the bill of costs.

Code 1858, § 3207 (deriv. Acts 1841-1842, ch. 129, § 7); Shan., § 4949; mod. Code 1932, § 9102; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1604.

Collateral References. 20 Am. Jur. 2d Costs § 52.

20 C.J.S. Costs §§ 1, 249, 255.

20-12-105. Number of witnesses.

Not more than two (2) witnesses called to prove the same fact shall be taxed in any bill of costs against the losing party, except in case of witnesses called to attack or sustain the character of a witness or party.

If more than the number of witnesses allowed are examined in proof of any particular fact, a motion shall be made at the term at which the cause is tried, and the court shall instruct the clerk as to the taxation of costs. The motion shall not be made afterwards without good cause shown.

Code 1858, §§ 3213, 3214 (deriv. Acts 1783, ch. 11, § 4); Acts 1859-1860, ch. 35, § 1; Shan., §§ 4955, 4956; Code 1932, §§ 9108, 9109; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1605.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 243.

Collateral References. 20 Am. Jur. 2d Costs § 53.

20 C.J.S. Costs § 242.

Witnesses' and stenographers' fees, service of subpoenas, and depositions, as allowable items of costs in suit by beneficiary respecting trust. 9 A.L.R.2d 1132.

20-12-106. Dismissal — Compromise.

Suits may be dismissed, in writing, out of term time as well as in term, and further costs stopped. If compromised and dismissed before the return day of the original writ, or before the court to which an appeal is taken from the judgment of a court of general sessions, no costs, except the clerk's fee for issuing the writ and the sheriff's fee for serving it, if served, shall be taxed.

Code 1858, § 3199 (deriv. Acts 1826, ch. 28, § 1); Shan., § 4940; Code 1932, § 9093; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1606.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 953.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Compromise and Settlement, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Real Property — 1954 Tennessee Survey, 7 Vand. L. Rev. 921.

20-12-107. Omitted costs.

Costs omitted in taxing the bills of costs may be retaxed at any time upon application to the court; but if the judgment for costs has been paid, the party against whom the retaxation is asked shall have five (5) days' notice of the application.

Code 1858, § 3211 (deriv. Acts 1855-1856, ch. 70, § 1); Shan., § 4953; Code 1932, § 9106; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1607.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 243.

20-12-108. Correction of erroneous taxation.

If the taxation of costs is excessive by charging the costs of witnesses who were not examined or by charging costs to an improper party, or taxing costs contrary to law, or the taxation is otherwise erroneous, the party aggrieved may move the court for a retaxation, setting forth the particulars in which the clerk has erred.

Code 1858, § 3212; Shan., § 4954; Code 1932, § 9107; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1608.

Cited: James v. Williams, 20 Tenn. App. 420, 99 S.W.2d 831, 1936 Tenn. App. LEXIS 33 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1936); Lawrence v. Chancery Court, 188 F.3d 687, 1999 FED App. 314P, 1999 U.S. App. LEXIS 20773 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1999).

20-12-109. Charged against real plaintiff.

Where suit is brought in the name of one for the use of another, the person for whose use the action is brought is the real plaintiff, against whom judgment for costs shall be given.

Code 1858, § 3200 (deriv. Acts 1825, ch. 29, § 1; 1825, ch. 45, § 5); Shan., § 4941; Code 1932, § 9094; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1609.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Assignments, § 53; 10 Tenn. Juris., Drains and Sewers, § 12; 20 Tenn. Juris., Parties, § 4.

Cited: Andrew Jackson Hotel, Inc. v. Platt, 19 Tenn. App. 360, 89 S.W.2d 179, 1935 Tenn. App. LEXIS 48 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1935); Metropolitan Life Ins. Co. v. Brown, 25 Tenn. App. 514, 160 S.W.2d 434, 1941 Tenn. App. LEXIS 141 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1941).

20-12-110. Dismissal, abatement or discontinuance.

In cases of nonsuit, dismissal, abatement by death of plaintiff or discontinuance, the defendant is the successful party, within the meaning of §20-12-101.

Code 1858, § 3201 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 74); Shan., § 4942; Code 1932, § 9095; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1610.

Cited: Hagerty v. Hughes, 63 Tenn. 222, 1874 Tenn. LEXIS 233 (1874); O'Neill v. Parks, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 568 (Tenn. Ct. App. Sept. 29, 2008).

20-12-111. Appeal from general sessions court.

If the appeal of the defendant from a judgment of a court of general sessions is dismissed for any cause, the original plaintiff is the successful party, and so of other cases.

Code 1858, § 3202; Shan., § 4943; Code 1932, § 9096; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1611.

Cited: Dalton v. Dean, 22 Tenn. App. 56, 117 S.W.2d 973, 1938 Tenn. App. LEXIS 4 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1938); Hamby v. Northcut, 25 Tenn. App. 11, 149 S.W.2d 484, 1940 Tenn. App. LEXIS 87 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1940); Coleman v. Coleman, 190 Tenn. 286, 229 S.W.2d 341, 1950 Tenn. LEXIS 480 (1950).

20-12-112. Jurisdictional defects — Irregular transfer.

Where a suit is dismissed from any court for want of jurisdiction or because it has not been regularly transferred from an inferior to a superior court, the costs shall be adjudged against the party attempting to institute or bring up the cause.

Code 1858, § 3215 (deriv. Acts 1832, ch. 5); Shan., § 4957; Code 1932, § 9110; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1612.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Costs, § 28.

Cited: O'Neill v. Parks, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 568 (Tenn. Ct. App. Sept. 29, 2008).

20-12-113. Abatement of action.

When a plaintiff suffers the plaintiff's action to abate by the death of the defendant or other cause, or where the suit abates by the death of the plaintiff and the plaintiff's representatives fail to revive the action, judgment for costs may be rendered against the plaintiff or representatives in the name of the officers of court, or any of them, and, if against a representative, shall be paid as other claims against the estate.

Code 1858, § 3209; Shan., § 4951; mod. Code 1932, § 9104; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1613.

Cited: O'Neill v. Parks, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 568 (Tenn. Ct. App. Sept. 29, 2008).

20-12-114. Nominal damages recovered.

In civil actions founded upon assault, assault and battery, malicious prosecution, false imprisonment or for the recovery of damages for overflowing of water by the erection of a gristmill or other waterworks of utility, the plaintiff recovers no more costs than damages, unless the recovery exceeds five dollars ($5.00).

Code 1858, § 3198 (deriv. Acts 1715, ch. 27, § 8; 1811, ch. 91, § 1; 1829, ch. 1, § 1; 1851-1852, ch. 146); Shan., § 4939; mod. Code 1932, § 9092; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1616.

Cited: Smythe v. Easy Quick Stores, Inc., 754 S.W.2d 57, 1988 Tenn. App. LEXIS 44 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1988); O'Neill v. Parks, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 568 (Tenn. Ct. App. Sept. 29, 2008).

20-12-115. Actions for overflow of water.

In all suits for the recovery of damages occasioned by the overflowing of water by the erection of a dam for a grist or saw mill or other waterworks of utility, the plaintiff, if successful, shall be entitled to full costs, unless the plaintiff's damages do not exceed five dollars ($5.00), in which case the plaintiff shall not recover more costs than damages.

Code 1858, § 3404 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 74; 1851-1852, ch. 146, § 1); Shan., § 5159; Code 1932, § 9318; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1617.

Cited: O'Neill v. Parks, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 568 (Tenn. Ct. App. Sept. 29, 2008).

20-12-116. Usury.

If it appears in the action that usurious interest has been intentionally taken or reserved, the person taking or reserving such usury shall pay full costs.

Code 1858, § 3205; Shan., § 4947; Code 1932, § 9100; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1618.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 24 Tenn. Juris., Usury, § 33.

Cited: O'Neill v. Parks, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 568 (Tenn. Ct. App. Sept. 29, 2008).

20-12-117. Taxation between defendants.

The defendants against whom judgment has been recovered are entitled, as between themselves, to a taxation of the costs of witnesses whose testimony was obtained at the instance of one (1) of the defendants and inured exclusively to the defendant's benefit.

Code 1858, § 3210 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 178, § 2); Shan., § 4952; Code 1932, § 9105; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1619.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 243.

Cited: O'Neill v. Parks, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 568 (Tenn. Ct. App. Sept. 29, 2008).

Collateral References. 20 C.J.S. Costs § 222.

20-12-118. Cases not expressly covered.

If any case occurs not directly or by fair implication embraced in the express provisions of the law, the court may make such disposition of the costs as, in its sound discretion, may seem right.

Code 1858, § 3220; Shan., § 4962; Code 1932, § 9115; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1620.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 242, 245-247.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Costs, § 6.

Law Reviews.

The Procedural Details of the Proposed Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure, VII. Disposition of Appeals (John L. Sobieski, Jr.), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 90.

Cited: O'Neill v. Parks, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 568 (Tenn. Ct. App. Sept. 29, 2008).

20-12-119. Discretion of judge.

In all civil cases, whether tried by a jury or before the court without a jury, the presiding judge shall have a right to adjudge the cost.

In doing so, the presiding judge shall be authorized, in the presiding judge's discretion, to apportion the cost between the litigants, as in the presiding judge's opinion the equities of the case demand.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) or (b), in a civil proceeding, where a trial court grants a motion to dismiss pursuant to Rule 12 of the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure for failure to state a claim upon which relief may be granted, the court shall award the party or parties against whom the dismissed claims were pending at the time the successful motion to dismiss was granted the costs and reasonable and necessary attorney's fees incurred in the proceedings as a consequence of the dismissed claims by that party or parties. The awarded costs and fees shall be paid by the party or parties whose claim or claims were dismissed as a result of the granted motion to dismiss.

Costs shall include all reasonable and necessary litigation costs actually incurred due to the proceedings that resulted from the filing of the dismissed claims, including, but not limited to:

Court costs;

Attorneys' fees;

Court reporter fees;

Interpreter fees; and

Guardian ad litem fees.

An award of costs pursuant to this subsection (c) shall be made only after all appeals of the issue of the granting of the motion to dismiss have been exhausted and if the final outcome is the granting of the motion to dismiss. The award of costs and attorneys' fees pursuant to this section shall be stayed until a final decision which is not subject to appeal is rendered.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the court shall not require a party to pay costs under this section in excess of a combined total of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in any single lawsuit. Where multiple parties are entitled to recover their costs from a single party under this section and those parties’ combined actual costs under this section exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), then the court shall apportion the awarded costs to the moving parties in proportion to the amount of each moving party’s incurred costs unless agreed otherwise by the moving parties. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the award of costs as provided for in other sections of the code or at common law.

This subsection (c) shall not apply to:

Actions by or against the state, other governmental entities, or public officials acting in their official capacity or under color of law;

Any claim that is dismissed by the granting of a motion to dismiss that was filed more than sixty (60) days after the moving party received service of the latest complaint, counter-complaint or cross-complaint in which that dismissed claim was made;

Any claim that the party against whom the motion to dismiss was filed withdrew, or in good faith amended to state a claim upon which relief may be granted; however, this subdivision (c)(5)(C) shall not apply unless a pleading providing notice of the withdrawal or amendment was filed with the court and delivered to the opposing party or parties at least three (3) days before the date set for the hearing of the motion to dismiss or by the deadline for the filing of a response to the motion to dismiss, whichever is earlier. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a party from striking its own motion to dismiss;

Actions by pro se litigants, except where the court also finds that the pro se party acted unreasonably in bringing, or refusing to voluntarily withdraw, the dismissed claim;

Any claim which is a good faith, non-frivolous claim filed for the express purpose of extending, modifying, or reversing existing precedent, law or regulation, or for the express purpose of establishing the meaning, lawfulness or constitutionality of a law, regulation or United States or Tennessee constitutional right where the meaning, lawfulness or constitutionality is a matter of first impression that has not been established by precedent in a published opinion by the Tennessee supreme court, court of appeals, court of criminal appeals, a United States district court in Tennessee, or by the United States supreme court. This subdivision (c)(5)(E) shall not apply unless at the time the successful motion to dismiss was filed the party that made the dismissed claim had specially pleaded in its latest complaint, counter-complaint or cross-complaint that the dismissed claim was made for one (1) of the express purposes listed above and cited the contrary precedent or interpretation the party seeks to distinguish or overcome, or whether the issue to be decided is a matter of first impression as described in this subdivision (c)(5)(E); or

Any claim for which relief could be granted under a law, a court precedent published by a court described in subdivision (c)(5)(E), or a regulation, that was in effect and applicable to the claim at the time the motion to dismiss was filed; where that law, precedent or regulation was cited in the pleading in which the dismissed claim was made or in the response to the motion to dismiss; and where the motion to dismiss the claim was granted due to the subsequent repeal, amendment, overruling or distinguishing of that law, regulation or published court precedent.

This section shall not be construed to limit the ability of any court to dismiss a claim or assess costs against a party whose claim has been dismissed, where permitted or required by other law, court rule or at common law.

Acts 1917, ch. 107, § 1; Shan., § 4962a1; Code 1932, § 9116; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1621; Acts 2012, ch. 1046, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 1046, § 2 provided that the act, which added subsection (c), shall apply to claims filed on and after July 1, 2012.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 1046, § 2. July 1, 2012.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 242, 245, 248.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 254.

Law Reviews.

All Losers Should Pay in Tennessee: How to Amend T.C.A. Section 20-12-119 to Deter Meritless Claims, 44 U. Mem. L. Rev. 183 (2013).

Judicial Reform at the Lowest Level: A Model Statute for Small Claims Courts, Part III, 28 Vand. L. Rev. 747.

Cited: Long v. Wood, 194 Tenn. 511, 253 S.W.2d 731, 1952 Tenn. LEXIS 414 (1952); Hunt v. Hunt, 56 Tenn. App. 683, 412 S.W.2d 7, 1965 Tenn. App. LEXIS 235 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1965); Livingston v. Livingston, 58 Tenn. App. 271, 429 S.W.2d 452, 1967 Tenn. App. LEXIS 267 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1968); Vick v. Vick, 60 Tenn. App. 600, 449 S.W.2d 717, 1968 Tenn. App. LEXIS 289 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1968); State ex rel. Carpenter v. Cox, 61 Tenn. App. 101, 453 S.W.2d 69, 1969 Tenn. App. LEXIS 354 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1969); Shelby County v. Armour, 495 S.W.2d 816, 1971 Tenn. App. LEXIS 241 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1971); Rogers v. Russell, 733 S.W.2d 79, 1986 Tenn. App. LEXIS 3315 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1986); Carson Creek Vacation Resorts v. Department of Revenue, 865 S.W.2d 1, 1993 Tenn. LEXIS 370 (Tenn. 1993); Crew v. First Source Furniture Group, 259 S.W.3d 656, 2008 Tenn. LEXIS 418 (Tenn. June 24, 2008); Barrett v. Town of Nolensville, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. App. LEXIS 119 (Tenn. Ct. App. Mar. 10, 2011); In re Conservatorship of Paul Estil Lindsey, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. App. LEXIS 503 (Tenn. Ct. App. Sept. 16, 2011).

20-12-120. Security given by plaintiff.

No leading process shall issue from any court without security being given by the party at whose instance the action is brought for the successful prosecution of the party's action, and, in case of failure, for the payment of court costs and taxes that may be awarded against the party, unless in cases and instances specially excepted.

Code 1858, § 3187 (deriv. Acts 1787, ch. 19, § 1); Shan., § 4923; mod. Code 1932, § 9075; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1622; Acts 1994, ch. 967, § 1; 1999, ch. 191, § 1.

Cross-References. Bond given by plaintiff, §20-2-102.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 123.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 1-4-2, 1-4-3.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 81; 10 Tenn. Juris., Ejectment, § 29.

Law Reviews.

Recent Developments — Domestic Relations — Divorce — Due Process for Indigent Plaintiffs, 47 Tenn. L. Rev. 845.

Cited: In re Barrett, 132 F. 362, 1904 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 133 (D. Tenn. 1904); Kelley v. Byington, 185 Tenn. 421, 206 S.W.2d 409, 1947 Tenn. LEXIS 347 (1947); McCalla v. Nelson, 44 Tenn. App. 164, 313 S.W.2d 462, 1956 Tenn. App. LEXIS 172 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1956); Brotherton v. Solomon, 307 F. Supp. 1325, 1970 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13258 (E.D. Tenn. 1970); A'La v. Tennessee Dep't of Correction, 914 S.W.2d 914, 1995 Tenn. App. LEXIS 596 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1995); Jacob v. Partee, 389 S.W.3d 339, 2012 Tenn. App. LEXIS 555 (Tenn. Ct. App. Aug. 10, 2012).

20-12-121. Failure to take security.

Any clerk who neglects to take the security required by §20-12-120 is liable on the clerk's official bond to all persons aggrieved by the neglect.

Code 1858, § 3188 (deriv. Acts 1787, ch. 19, § 3); Shan., § 4924; Code 1932, § 9076; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1623.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 123.

Cited: McCalla v. Nelson, 44 Tenn. App. 164, 313 S.W.2d 462, 1956 Tenn. App. LEXIS 172 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1956).

20-12-122. Actions commenced by petition or motion.

In any action commenced by petition or motion, the plaintiff may be required to give security.

Code 1858, § 3189 (deriv. Acts 1826, ch. 29, § 1); Shan., § 4925; Code 1932, § 9077; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1624.

Cited: Brotherton v. Solomon, 307 F. Supp. 1325, 1970 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13258 (E.D. Tenn. 1970); A'La v. Tennessee Dep't of Correction, 914 S.W.2d 914, 1995 Tenn. App. LEXIS 596 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1995).

20-12-123. Appeals from general sessions court.

The plaintiff in an action commenced before a judge of the court of general sessions, shall, on motion, be ruled to give security or further security in the circuit court, to which the cause may be taken for the correction of errors.

Code 1858, § 3190 (deriv. Acts 1813, ch. 131, § 2); Shan., § 4926; mod. Code 1932, § 9078; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1625.

Collateral References. 20 C.J.S. Costs §§ 134, 401.

Costs
228, 231(3).

20-12-124. Rule to give security.

Any person required by law to give security for costs may, at any stage of the cause, be ruled to give such security, if it has not previously been done, or to justify or give new or additional security on sufficient cause shown.

Code 1858, § 3191 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 33, § 2); Shan., § 4927; mod. Code 1932, § 9079; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1626.

Cross-References. Clerk's fee, §8-21-401.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Bail and Recognizance, § 7.

Law Reviews.

The Pauper's Oath in Appeals From General Sessions Court (Robert A. Lanier), 19 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 17 (1983).

Cited: Brotherton v. Solomon, 307 F. Supp. 1325, 1970 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13258 (E.D. Tenn. 1970).

20-12-125. Terms of bond.

In all cases of bonds, for the prosecution of original suits, or where security is taken or recorded in any court, sufficient security shall be taken by the clerk to pay all costs that may be at any time adjudged against the principal, in the event they are not paid by the principal. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, where an attorney undertakes to serve as surety after July 1, 1999, such surety shall only be obligated for amounts required by law or included in the clerk's bill of costs, and shall not be responsible for discretionary costs. In such instances, the clerk may require an additional surety other than the attorney as may be necessary to secure payment for discretionary costs.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 120, § 1; Shan., § 4935; Code 1932, § 9088; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1627; Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 2; 1999, ch. 207, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by Tenn. R. Civ. P. 62.05, and T.R.A.P. 6.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 81.

Law Reviews.

The Pauper's Oath in Appeals From General Sessions Court (Robert A. Lanier), 19 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 17 (1983).

20-12-126. Omission of provisions from bond.

No omission or neglect to insert the proper conditions in the bonds shall vitiate or impair the validity of the bonds.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 120, § 3; Shan., § 4937; Code 1932, § 9090; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1628.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 71-82.

Law Reviews.

The Pauper's Oath in Appeals From General Sessions Court (Robert A. Lanier), 19 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 17 (1983).

Cited: Coker v. Armco Drainage & Metal Products Co., 192 Tenn. 10, 236 S.W.2d 980, 1951 Tenn. LEXIS 375 (1951).

20-12-127. Pauper's oath.

Any civil action may be commenced by a resident of this state without giving security as required by law for costs and without the payment of litigation taxes due by:

Filing the following oath of poverty:

I, , do solemnly swear under penalties of perjury, that owing to my poverty, I am not able to bear the expense of the action which I am about to commence, and that I am justly entitled to the relief sought, to the best of my belief;

and

Filing an accompanying affidavit of indigency as prescribed by court rule.

The filing of a civil action without paying the costs or taxes or giving security for the costs or taxes does not relieve the person filing the action from responsibility for the costs or taxes but suspends their collection until taxed by the court.

Code 1858, § 3192 (deriv. Acts 1821, ch. 22, §§ 1, 2; 1829, ch. 88, § 1); Acts 1891, ch. 221, § 1; 1897, ch. 100, § 1; 1901, ch. 126, § 1; 1903, ch. 197, § 1; Shan., § 4928; Code 1932, § 9080; Acts 1957, ch. 20, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1629; Acts 1983, ch. 393, § 1; 1995, ch. 242, § 1.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rule 29 of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee.

This section is referred to in Rule XV of the Rules of Court for Divisions I Through VI of the Shelby County Court of General Sessions.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 124, 331.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 346, 347, 701.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-4-3.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, §§ 63-66, 69, 75, 199; 3 Tenn. Juris., Attachment and Garnishment, § 33; 5 Tenn. Juris., Certiorari, § 49; 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, § 3; 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 99; 9 Tenn. Juris., Divorce and Alimony, § 2; 21 Tenn. Juris., Recovery of Personal Property, § 14.

Law Reviews.

The Pauper's Oath in Appeals From General Sessions Court (Robert A. Lanier), 19 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 17 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. The provisions of subsection (b), requiring prepayment of a cash bond regardless of indigency by any person seeking an absolute divorce, are unconstitutional. OAG 87-68 (4/15/87)

Cited: Priest v. Union Agency, 174 Tenn. 304, 125 S.W.2d 142, 1938 Tenn. LEXIS 93 (1939); In re Wilson, 314 F. Supp. 271, 1970 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11964 (E.D. Tenn. 1970); Dungan v. Dungan, 579 S.W.2d 183, 1979 Tenn. LEXIS 424 (Tenn. 1979); Elmwood Apts. v. Woodson, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. App. LEXIS 196 (Tenn. Ct. App. Apr. 19, 2011).

20-12-128. Guardian's or conservator's oath — Protection from liability.

The next friend or any person who has been appointed by any court guardian, guardian ad litem or conservator of any person adjudicated incompetent or infant, may commence and prosecute an action, suit or cross suit or appeal without giving bond or security for costs, by taking and subscribing an oath that the next friend, guardian, guardian ad litem or conservator has no property of the person adjudicated incompetent or infant, out of which to bear the expense of such action, and that the next friend, guardian, guardian ad litem or conservator verily believes that such person adjudicated incompetent or infant is justly entitled to the redress sought. The next friend or person may also file an accompanying affidavit of indigency as prescribed by court rule. The filing of such a civil action without paying the costs or taxes or giving security for the costs or taxes does not relieve the responsibility for the costs and taxes, but merely suspends their collection until taxed by the court.

The guardian, guardian ad litem or conservator shall not incur any personal liability for such action, unless the court finds that the step was not taken in good faith.

Acts 1871, ch. 111, § 1; 1907, ch. 25, § 1; Shan., § 4929; Acts 1929, ch. 19, § 1; mod. Code 1932, § 9081; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1630; Acts 1995, ch. 242, § 2; 2011, ch. 47, § 15.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “guardian, guardian ad litem or conservator” for “guardian or guardian ad litem” throughout the section; and substituted “person adjudicated incompetent” for “idiot, lunatic, person of unsound mind” throughout (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 110. July 1, 2011.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rule 29 of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 124.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Minors, § 25.

Cited: Martin v. Martin, 213 Tenn. 345, 373 S.W.2d 609, 1963 Tenn. LEXIS 488 (1963).

20-12-129. Next friend's oath.

A person acting as the next friend of an infant may on like terms prosecute a suit or appeal for the infant in forma pauperis, upon taking and subscribing an oath that the infant, in whose behalf the action or suit is begun, is not able, and has not sufficient property, to bear the expenses of the action or suit about to be commenced, by filing an accompanying affidavit of indigency as prescribed by court rule and that the infant is justly entitled to the relief sought, to the best of the next friend's belief.

Acts 1889, ch. 105, § 1; Shan., § 4930; mod. Code 1932, § 9082; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1631; Acts 1995, ch. 242, § 3.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rule 29 of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 124.

20-12-130. Personal representative's oath — Protection from liability.

Any personal representative of the estate of any deceased person in this state may commence and prosecute any action or suit, or appeal, in favor of the estate represented by the personal representative, in any court without giving bond and security for costs, by taking and subscribing an oath that the personal representative, as such personal representative, has no property belonging to the estate of the deceased out of which to bear the expenses of the action or suit by filing of an accompanying affidavit of indigency as prescribed by court rule, and that the personal representative verily believes that the estate, for the benefit of which the action or suit is brought, is justly entitled to the redress sought. The filing of such a civil action without paying the costs or taxes or giving security for the costs or taxes does not relieve the responsibility for the costs or taxes, but merely suspends their collection until taxed by the court.

In such case the personal representative shall not incur any personal liability, unless the court trying the case should be of the opinion and adjudge that the action was frivolous or malicious.

Acts 1897, ch. 133; Shan., § 4930a2; mod. Code 1932, § 9083; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1632; Acts 1995, ch. 242, § 4.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rule 29 of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee.

This section is referred to in Rule XV of the Rules of Court for Divisions I Through VI of the Shelby County Court of General Sessions.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 124, 249.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 701, 702.

20-12-131. Duties of officers and witnesses in cases in forma pauperis.

In the cases provided for by §§20-12-127 —20-12-130, the clerks and other officers of court shall perform all the usual duties required in the progress of an action or suit, and the witnesses shall attend, as in other cases, unless their depositions are taken under the provisions of this code.

Code 1858, § 3193 (deriv. Acts 1821, ch. 22, §§ 1, 4); Shan., § 4931; Code 1932, § 9084; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1633.

20-12-132. Dismissal of pauper's action.

If it is made to appear to the court, at any time before the trial, that the allegation of poverty is probably untrue, or the cause of action frivolous or malicious, the action may be dismissed.

The burden shall be upon a pauper to justify the pauper's oath.

Code 1858, § 3194 (deriv. Acts 1821, ch. 22, § 5); Shan., § 4932; mod. Code 1932, § 9085; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1634; Acts 1995, ch. 242, § 5.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rule 29 of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 124.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 2 Tenn. Juris., Appeal and Error, § 65; 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 42.

Law Reviews.

The Pauper's Oath in Appeals From General Sessions Court (Robert A. Lanier), 19 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 17 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. Requirement of surety bond to perfect appeal from general session court to circuit court; determination of party’s indigence. OAG 12-23, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 23 (2/23/12).

20-12-133. Judgment against pauper.

On failure, for any reason, to prosecute the action or suit with effect, judgment or decree shall be given against such poor persons, and execution awarded, as in other cases.

Code 1858, § 3195 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 88, § 1); Shan., § 4933; Code 1932, § 9086; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1635.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-4-3.

Law Reviews.

Recent Developments — Domestic Relations — Divorce — Due Process for Indigent Plaintiffs, 47 Tenn. L. Rev. 845.

20-12-134. Payment by state.

In all cases where any civil action is brought on behalf of the state, in law or equity, and the state is adjudged to pay all costs, the costs shall be paid out of the treasury, upon the costs being properly certified.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 76, § 2; Shan., § 4963; Code 1932, § 9117; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1636.

Cross-References. Bond not required, §20-13-101.

Payment of costs adjudged against county, §§5-9-308 —5-9-310.

20-12-135. Judgment against surety.

When security is given, judgment may, on motion, be rendered against the surety for costs, as well as against the principal. Judgment against an attorney as surety, for security taken or recorded after July 1, 1999, shall extend only to amounts required by law or included in the clerk's bill of costs, and shall not include discretionary costs.

Code 1858, § 3196 (deriv. Acts 1847-1848, ch. 62, § 1); Shan., § 4934; Code 1932, § 9087; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1637; Acts 1999, ch. 207, § 2.

Cross-References. Remedies for and against surety, §§25-3-122 —25-3-134.

Collateral References. Principal and surety
73.

20-12-136. Execution against principal and surety.

Where the costs in any case in a court of record, or before a judge of the court of general sessions, are adjudged against a party, judgment shall be rendered jointly against the party and the party's sureties, but the execution issued on the costs shall be collected from the party, if it can be. If execution cannot be collected from the party, then it shall be collected from the sureties. Execution issued against an attorney as surety, for security taken or recorded after July 1, 1999, shall collect only the amounts required by law or included in the clerk's bill of costs, and shall not include discretionary costs.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 120, § 2; Shan., § 4936; Code 1932, § 9089; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1638; Acts 1999, ch. 207, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Recent Developments — Domestic Relations — Divorce — Due Process for Indigent Plaintiffs, 47 Tenn. L. Rev. 845.

Collateral References. Execution
127.

20-12-137. Recovery from successful party.

All costs in civil actions accrued at the instance of the successful party that cannot be collected out of the other party may be recovered, on motion, by the person entitled to them, against the successful party and the surety on the successful party's cost bond.

Code 1858, § 3204 (deriv. Acts 1847-1848, ch. 62, § 2); Shan., § 4945; mod. Code 1932, § 9098; Acts 1939, ch. 62, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 9098; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1639.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 242, 245.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitations of Actions, § 17.

20-12-138. Notice of motion against successful party.

In all civil cases, when motions are made against the successful party for costs accrued at the successful party's instance, and that cannot be collected from the other party, five (5) days' written notice of the time and place, and the court before which the motion is to be made, shall be given to the defendant in the motion.

Acts 1879, ch. 113, § 1; Shan., § 4946; mod. Code 1932, § 9099; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1640.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Limitations of Actions, § 17.

Cited: Morris Plan Bank v. Scott, 176 Tenn. 496, 144 S.W.2d 741, 1940 Tenn. LEXIS 93 (1940).

20-12-139. Bill of costs on appeal.

In case of appeals from the circuit or chancery court, the clerk shall make out a complete bill of costs, which shall accompany the record, and a copy of the bill of costs shall be placed upon the execution docket of the court below.

Code 1858, § 3216; Shan., § 4958; Code 1932, § 9111; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1641.

Collateral References. 20 Am. Jur. 2d Costs §§ 91, 94.

20 C.J.S. Costs §§ 279, 368.

Costs
202-205.

20-12-140. Payments from appellate to trial court.

When the costs accrued in the appellate court, and in the court below, are paid to the clerk of the appellate court, the clerk of the appellate court shall pay so much of them as accrued in the court below to the clerk of the court and take a receipt for the payment.

Code 1858, § 3217; Shan., § 4959; Code 1932, § 9112; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1642.

Cross-References. Duty of supreme court clerk to pay over costs, §18-3-102.